Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 12 Rhode Island Turnpike and Bridge Authority
24-12-40B.
Certain bonds guaranteed by state.

The authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance at one time or from time to time of bonds of the authority in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars ($17,500,000) for paying a part of the cost of the Newport Bridge; the bonds shall be designated “Newport Bridge bonds — Guaranteed by the state,” and shall mature in such annual instalments, the first of which shall be made payable not earlier than five (5) years after the date of the bonds and the last of which shall be made payable not later than fifty (50) years after the date of the bonds, as may be determined by the authority with the approval of the general treasurer. The bonds shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding six percent (6%) per annum and shall be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at the price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. The principal of and the interest on the bonds shall be payable at the office of the general treasurer, or at the option of the holder, at any bank or trust company within or without the state. The bonds shall be sold by the authority at public sale upon a call for sealed bids to be received at the office of the general treasurer in the city of Providence; the authority shall cause a notice of the sale to be published at least once at least fourteen (14) days before the date fixed for the receipt of bids in a daily newspaper of general circulation published in the city of Providence and in a daily newspaper of a general circulation or a financial journal published in New York City and devoted primarily to the subject of state, county, and municipal bonds; but no sale shall be made at less than par and accrued interest. The proceeds of the bonds shall be deposited to the credit of a special construction fund and applied by the authority to the payment of the cost of the Newport Bridge. The authority is further authorized, subject to the approval of the general treasurer, to provide by resolution for the issuance of bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds then outstanding which shall have been issued under the provisions of this paragraph. The issuance of the bonds and the maturities and other details thereof shall be governed by the foregoing provisions of this subsection insofar as this chapter may be applicable. The state hereby guarantees the payment of the principal of and interest on all bonds issued under the provisions of this subsection as the bonds respectively become due and payable and the full faith and credit of the state are hereby pledged for the payment, and a statement to that effect shall be endorsed on the bonds by the general treasurer.

The revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter for paying the balance of the cost of the Newport Bridge, which revenue bonds, together with the bonds issued under the provisions of subsection (a) and other revenue bonds, if any, issued under the provisions of §

24-12-21

shall not exceed an aggregate principal amount of forty-seven million five hundred thousand dollars ($47,500,000) and shall mature at such time or times, not exceeding fifty (50) years from their date, as may be determined by the authority. Prior to the issuance of the bonds authorized to be issued under the provisions of the first subsection of this section, or the revenue bonds, if any, issued under the provisions of §

24-12-21

, or the revenue bonds issued for paying the balance of the cost of the Newport Bridge, the authority shall determine the respective amounts which are to be deposited in each fiscal year to the credit of a special fund for the payment of the interest on and the principal of the bonds and to create a reserve for such purpose, and also to provide a fund for accelerating the maturity or maturities of the bonds (the amounts being hereinafter collectively called the “Principal and interest requirements for the bonds”).

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter, the authority is hereby authorized and directed to combine the Newport Bridge and the Mount Hope Bridge for financing purposes and to fix, revise, charge and collect tolls for the use of the Newport Bridge and the Mount Hope Bridge, which tolls and all other revenues derived from the Mount Hope Bridge and the Newport Bridge, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair, and operation and to provide the reserves therefor as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds or in the trust agreement securing the bonds, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or the trust agreement and deposited to the credit of the following funds in the following order, until the bonds shall have been paid or adequate provisions shall have been made for their payment:

To the credit of a special fund for paying the interest on and the principal of the revenue bonds issued under the provisions of subsection (a) of §

24-12-18

and the revenue bonds, if any, issued under the provisions of §

24-12-21

, such amount as may be required to make the amount deposited in the then current fiscal year to the credit of the fund equal to the principal and interest requirements of such bonds in such fiscal year;

To the credit of a special fund for the payment of the interest on and the principal of the bonds issued under the provisions of subsection (a), the amount as may be required to make the amount deposited in the then current fiscal year to the credit of the fund equal to the total amount of the principal of and the interest on the bonds which is payable in the fiscal year; and

To the credit of the special fund referred to in subsection (c)(1), the balance, if any, of the revenues; provided, however, that if the amount so deposited to the credit of the special fund referred to in subsection (c)(1) or to the credit of the special fund referred to in subsection (c)(2), in any fiscal year shall be less than the required amount, the requirement therefor shall nevertheless be cumulative and the amount of any deficiency in any fiscal year shall be added to the amount otherwise required to be deposited in each fiscal year thereafter until such time as all deficiencies shall have been made up.

History of Section.

P.L. 1965, ch. 43, § 3; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-40C.
Additional state guaranteed and revenue bonds for Newport Bridge.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter, the authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance at one time or from time to time for completion of the Newport Bridge seven million dollars ($7,000,000) aggregate principal amount of bonds of the authority consisting of (1) state guaranteed bonds of the authority in the aggregate principal amount of not exceeding three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) and designated “Newport Bridge bonds — Guaranteed by the state,” and (2) with the approval of the governor, revenue bonds of the authority in the aggregate principal amount of not exceeding three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) and designated “Newport Bridge revenue bonds.” The state guaranteed bonds and revenue bonds shall be in addition to the bonds of the authority authorized pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this chapter, and the issuance thereof and the maturities and other details thereof (including the approval of the maturities of the state guaranteed bonds by the general treasurer) shall be governed by the provisions of §

24-12-40B

insofar as §

24-12-40B

may be applicable and consistent with the provisions of this section. The state guaranteed bonds and revenue bonds shall be treated, respectively, as state guaranteed bonds and revenue bonds issued pursuant to § 24-12-40B for the purposes of deposits to the credit of and payments from the special funds established pursuant thereto; provided, however that the proceeds of the additional state guaranteed bonds shall be deposited to the credit of a special bond reserve fund to be held by the general treasurer and applied (together with any investment income therefrom), first, to the reimbursement of the state for all payments theretofore made by the state for interest due on outstanding “Newport Bridge bonds — Guaranteed by the state” of the authority pursuant to the guaranty of the state endorsed on the bonds, and second, to the payment, pursuant to the guaranty, of interest becoming due on “Newport Bridge bonds — Guaranteed by the state” of the authority, including the additional state guaranteed bonds issued under the provisions of this section. The authority is further authorized, subject to the approval of the general treasurer, to provide by resolution for the issuance of bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any of the additional state guaranteed bonds. The state hereby guarantees the payment of the principal of and the interest on all the additional state guaranteed bonds, including any bonds issued to refund the bonds, issued under the provisions of this section as the bonds respectively become due and payable, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the payment, and a statement to that effect shall be endorsed on the bonds by the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 228, § 1.

24-12-40D.
Additional state guaranteed bonds for Newport Bridge.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing provisions of this chapter, the authority is hereby authorized to provide by resolution for the issuance at one time or from time to time for completion of the Newport Bridge ten million dollars ($10,000,000) aggregate principal amount of bonds of the authority designated “Newport Bridge bonds — Guaranteed by the state.” The state guaranteed bonds shall be in addition to the bonds of the authority authorized pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this chapter, (except that the three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000) revenue bonds payable solely from toll revenues of the Newport Bridge and the Mount Hope Bridge authorized by §

24-12-40C

but unissued by the authority to pay for a part of the cost of completion of the Newport Bridge shall not be issued) and the issuance thereof and the maturities and other details thereof (including the approval of the maturities of the state guaranteed bonds by the general treasurer) shall be governed by the provisions of §

24-12-40B

insofar as §

24-12-40B

may be applicable and consistent with the provisions of this section. The state guaranteed bonds shall be treated as state guaranteed bonds issued pursuant to § 24-12-40B for the purposes of deposits to the credit of and payments from the special funds established pursuant thereto; provided, however, that a portion of the proceeds of the additional state guaranteed bonds may be deposited to the credit of a special bond reserve fund to be held by the general treasurer and applied (together with any interest income therefrom) to the payment of interest becoming due on the additional state guaranteed bonds issued under the provisions of this section. The authority is further authorized subject to the approval of the general treasurer to provide by resolution for the issuance of bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any of the additional state guaranteed bonds. The state hereby guarantees the payment of the principal of and the interest on all the additional state guaranteed bonds, including any bonds issued to refund the bonds, issued under the provisions of this section as the bonds respectively become due and payable, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the payment, and a statement to that effect shall be endorsed on the bonds by the general treasurer.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 183, § 1.

24-12-40E.
State guaranteed bonds — General provision.

All payments made by the authority to the general fund for amounts loaned to the authority for payments on bond interest paid on state guaranteed bonds, shall, if requested in writing by the director of administration, be deposited by the state controller to a restricted receipt account. The moneys and interest or income earned from their investment shall be used for the payment of debt service cost (principal and interest) for state general obligation bonds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 167, art. XIV, § 1.

24-12-40F.
Title to Sakonnet River Bridge vested in Rhode Island turnpike and Bridge authority — Institution of tolls.

All powers, control, and jurisdiction of and title to the Sakonnet River Bridge is authorized to be transferred to the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority. Beginning August 19, 2013, and concluding on June 30, 2014, the authority may charge and collect tolls for the use of the Sakonnet River Bridge to provide funds sufficient with any other monies available therefor for paying the costs of acquiring, leasing, maintaining, repairing, and operating the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge, the Mount Hope Bridge, the Newport Bridge, the Sakonnet River Bridge, the turnpike, and additional facilities. Provided, however, until June 30, 2014, the toll imposed on the Sakonnet River Bridge shall not exceed ten cents ($0.10).

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 4; P.L. 2013, ch. 143, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 16, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 1.

24-12-40G.
Title to Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge vested in Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority.

All powers, control, and jurisdiction of and title to the Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge is authorized to be transferred to the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 4.

24-12-41.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable, and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of that court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-41

.

24-12-42.
Narragansett Bay Bridge authority obligations.

All obligations of the Narragansett Bay Bridge authority created by chapter 2152 of the public laws of 1948 to repay any advances made to it by the Jamestown Bridge commission before January 1, 1954 shall be relinquished.

History of Section.

P.L. 1954, ch. 3390, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

24-12-42

.

24-12-43.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L., §

24-12-43

, as enacted by P.L. 1960, ch. 219, § 25; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 43, § 4.

24-12-44.
Construction of connecting highways.

As the construction of a highway from a point at or near the Kingston interchange on state route 3 (the same being interstate route 95) to a point at or near the Jamestown Bridge is necessary to effectuate the powers granted by this chapter, the general assembly shall appropriate the sum or sums as it may deem necessary to provide for the construction of the highway before the opening for traffic of the Newport Bridge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 219, § 25.

24-12-44A, 24-12-44B.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 21; Repealed by P.L. 1965, ch. 43, § 4.

24-12-45.
Liberal construction.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 219, § 28.

24-12-46.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable and if any of its provisions shall be held unconstitutional by any court of competent jurisdiction, the decision of the court shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions of this chapter. It is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been adopted had the unconstitutional provisions not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 219, § 29.

24-12-47.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

All other general or special laws inconsistent with any provision of this chapter are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 219, § 30.

24-12-48.
Provision for severance benefits.

In the event revenue bonds shall be issued in an amount estimated to be sufficient with any other available funds to pay the cost of constructing the Newport Bridge and opening the bridge for traffic, the authority shall cause a sufficient amount of the proceeds of the bonds as may be required to make the severance benefit payments hereinafter set forth, which amount shall in no event exceed the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), and which amount is hereby declared to be a part of the cost of the project or projects to be applied as follows:

The sufficient amount of the proceeds shall be deposited in a bank in the state in the name of the Jamestown and Newport ferry company thereby creating a “severance benefit” account to be used by the Jamestown and Newport ferry company as a checking account for the purpose of paying upon the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic the severance benefits hereinafter set forth; namely,

To employees of the department of transportation employed in the operation of the ferry from Jamestown to Newport at the time of the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic.

To employees of the department of transportation employed in the operation of the ferry from Jamestown to Newport, whose employment is terminated involuntarily including termination occasioned by accident or illness between the time of the initial issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this chapter and the time of the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic, who have been regularly employed by the department of transportation and its predecessors in the operation of such ferry, including the Jamestown and Newport ferry company and the Jamestown ferry authority for twenty-four (24) months or longer, and who are separated from such employment, severance benefits as follows:

For service of twenty-four (24) months — five (5) weeks additional pay at their respective rates of pay in effect at the time of the termination of their employment for regular work week exclusive of overtime.

For service beyond twenty-four (24) months — five (5) weeks pay plus thirty (30) days pay for each additional year or major fraction thereof beyond twenty-four (24) months at their respective rates of pay in effect at the time of the termination of their employment for a regular work week exclusive of overtime.

One day’s pay at their respective rates of pay for regular work day exclusive of overtime in effect at the time of the termination of their employment for each day of authorized accumulated sick leave remaining to their credit on the date of termination of their employment.

In event the severance benefits computed as provided in subdivision (1) shall in the aggregate exceed the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), the amount of the benefit payable to each of the persons specified above shall be proportionately reduced and the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be prorated among such persons.

All sums remaining in the checking account after completion of the payments herein provided shall be paid to the Rhode Island turnpike authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 165, § 22; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 154.

24-12-49.
Declaration of policy — Preventing economic harm to the town of Jamestown.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to prevent the economic harm to the town of Jamestown which will occur upon the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic through loss of employment opportunities on the Jamestown and Newport ferries and the resultant dislocation of the residence of the Jamestown and Newport ferries employees, therefore:

The authority shall, in the operation and maintenance of the Newport Bridge, engage employees of the department of transportation who were employed in connection with the operation of the ferries from Jamestown to Newport and whose employment is terminated voluntarily or involuntarily by reason of the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic, before it shall engage any other employees.

The several departments of the state government including the personnel department are hereby charged with the responsibility of providing employment opportunities within the state classified service and within reasonable commuting distance of their residences, for employees of the department of transportation who were employed in connection with the operation of ferries from Jamestown to Newport and whose employment has been terminated by reason of the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic.

During the period of the operation of the Newport Bridge as contemplated in this chapter, preference shall continue to be given to employees of the department of transportation employed in connection with the operation of the ferry from Jamestown to Newport and whose employment has been terminated by reason of the opening of the Newport Bridge to traffic in filling vacancies which may occur from time to time.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 210, § 1.

24-12-50.
Relationship to department of transportation.

The department of transportation is hereby constituted as the agency for the authority in carrying out all of the powers to construct, acquire, operate, and maintain turnpikes and bridges as conferred by the general laws upon the authority.

Nothing in chapter 13 of title 42 or in this amendment to chapter 12 of title 24 shall limit the discretions, powers, and authorities of the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority necessary or desirable for it to execute and carry out the covenants, agreements, duties, and liabilities assumed by it in the trust agreement by and between the authority and the then serving trustee under indenture dated as of April 1, 2010, as supplemented from time to time, nor shall these chapters be construed in any way to affect the rights, privileges, powers, and remedies of any trustee and its successors, or of the holders of the bonds issued under the indenture, or under any resolutions of the authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 111, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 20, § 3.

24-12-51.
The Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge.

Any bridge constructed in replacement of the Jamestown Bridge, as defined in §

24-12-1(7)

, shall be named and known as the “Jamestown Verrazzano Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 397, § 2.

24-12-51.1.
Former Jamestown Verrazano Bridge — Public fishing area.

The directors of the department of transportation and department of environmental management are hereby authorized and directed to retain the state-owned land adjacent to the former Jamestown Bridge on the North Kingstown side of the former bridge for use as a public parking area and public shore access site. The land so retained shall be open to the general public at no charge, and shall be made accessible to persons with disabilities, and shall provide the public with free and unfettered access to the shore and/or to any structure built over the water, in accordance with subsection (b) below.

The directors of the department of transportation and department of environmental management are hereby authorized and directed to give due consideration to further development of the public shore access site provided for in this section, particularly with regard to recreational fishing opportunities. Such consideration shall include, but not be limited to, the potential establishment of a public fishing pier, boat access, and/or park. In pursuing further development of the site, the directors shall seek to maximize public use and enjoyment of the site, particularly with regard to fishing access. Any structures or facilities so developed shall be open to the general public at no charge and shall be made accessible to persons with disabilities.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in any general or public law, rule or regulation, the state of Rhode Island shall be responsible for maintenance and security of the site described in this section.

Notwithstanding the aforementioned, the directors of the department of transportation and the department of environmental management are hereby authorized to limit public access to the site described in this section, between sunset and sunrise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 58; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 58; P.L. 2008, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 196, § 1.

24-12-52.
Succotash Road Bridge.

The Succotash Road Bridge in the town of South Kingstown shall be named and known as the “Norman Lavallee Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 460, § 1.

24-12-53.
William E. Powers Memorial Bridge.

The bridge on Board Street (route 114) in the town of Cumberland shall be named and known as the “William E. Powers Memorial Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 463, § 1.

24-12-54.
Alfred U. Menard Memorial Bridge.

The route 99 Sayles Hill Road overpass in the town of Lincoln shall be named and known as the “Alfred U. Menard Memorial Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 22, § 1.

24-12-55.
The Claiborne Pell Bridge.

The Newport Bridge shall hereafter be named and known as the “Claiborne Pell Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 458, § 1.

24-12-56.
Honorable John F. Conley Bridge.

The Greenwood Avenue bridge in the city of East Providence shall hereafter be known as the “Honorable John F. Conley Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 15, § 1.

24-12-57.
General George S. Greene Memorial Bridge.

The bridge known as Bridge No. 5 on Post Road in the Apponaug section of the city of Warwick shall hereafter be known as the “General George S. Greene Memorial Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 69, § 1.

24-12-58.
Robert E. Rowan, P.E. Bridge.

The Crawford Street Bridge shall hereafter be named and known as the “Robert E. Rowan, P.E. Bridge”.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 464, § 1.

24-12-59.
Bondholders’ rights not to be affected by the state.

The state does pledge to and agree with the holders of any bonds or notes issued under this chapter that the state will not limit or alter the rights vested in the authority to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders until those bonds or notes, together with their interest, with interest on any unpaid installments of interest, and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceeding by or on behalf of those holders, are fully met and discharged. The authority is authorized to include this pledge and agreement of the state in any agreement with the holders of those bonds or notes.

History of Section.

P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 2, § 3.